Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The Water Resources Department shall:
(1) Enter into a cost-matching agreement with the United States Geological Survey to
develop and publish ground water budgets for all major hydrologic basins in this state.
(2) Contract for a person to produce a peer-reviewed report  on statewide consumptive
water use that summarizes historical irrigation  consumptive water use for all irrigated fields
and estimates  open water evaporation from all major reservoirs in this state between 1984
and 2020.
(3) Expand a comprehensive ground water level monitoring network to improve estimates
of changes in ground water storage.
(4) Measure progress  in estimating and monitoring ground water levels, ground water
recharge and consumptive ground water use by:
(a) Publishing one or more reports that quantify ground water  recharge for all major
hydrologic basins in this state;
(b) Producing statewide maps and datasets that quantify  open water evaporation from
all major reservoirs in this state;
(c) Collecting and processing data concerning baseline ground water levels and use;
(d) Assessing the time and cost of conducting ground water basin studies; and
(e) Prioritizing hydrologic basins in this state for study.
(5) Ensure that department staff members serve as community engagement  coordinators
to help communities provide the data described in this section and use the data collected by
the department pursuant to this section.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2021 Act is repealed on January 2, 2032.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Water  Resources Department by section 1 (4), chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2021
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5545), for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, for technical services is
increased by $2,386,808 to implement the provisions of section 1 of this 2021 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2018 (HB 2018-B) Page 1
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2018 (HB 2018-B) Page 2